New York, session 2025-2026, A3452.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 400.00 of the 2 penal law, as amended by chapter 212 of the laws of 2022, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (a) (i) Applications shall be made and renewed, in the case of a 5 license to carry or possess a pistol or revolver or to purchase or take 6 possession of a semiautomatic rifle, to the licensing officer in the 7 city or county, as the case may be, where the applicant resides, is 8 principally employed or has [his or her] their principal place of busi- 9 ness as merchant or storekeeper; and, in the case of a license as 10 gunsmith or dealer in firearms, to the licensing officer where such 11 place of business is located. Blank applications shall, except in the 12 city of New York, be approved as to form by the superintendent of state 13 police. An application shall state the full name, date of birth, resi- 14 dence, present occupation of each person or individual signing the same, 15 whether or not [he or she] such individual is a citizen of the United 16 States, whether or not [he or she complies] they comply with each 17 requirement for eligibility specified in subdivision one of this section 18 and such other facts as may be required to show the good character, 19 competency and integrity of each person or individual signing the appli- 20 cation. An application shall be signed and verified by the applicant. 21 Each individual signing an application shall submit one photograph of 22 [himself or herself] themself and a duplicate for each required copy of 23 the application. Such photographs shall have been taken within thirty 24 days prior to filing the application. In case of a license as gunsmith EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06997-01-5 A. 3452 2 1 or dealer in firearms, the photographs submitted shall be two inches 2 square, and the application shall also state the previous occupation of 3 each individual signing the same and the location of the place of such 4 business, or of the bureau, agency, subagency, office or branch office 5 for which the license is sought, specifying the name of the city, town 6 or village, indicating the street and number and otherwise giving such 7 apt description as to point out reasonably the location thereof. In such 8 case, if the applicant is a firm, partnership or corporation, its name, 9 date and place of formation, and principal place of business shall be 10 stated. For such firm or partnership, the application shall be signed 11 and verified by each individual composing or intending to compose the 12 same, and for such corporation, by each officer thereof. 13 (ii) In the case of each application for the issuance or renewal of a 14 license to carry or possess a pistol or revolver, the licensing officer 15 shall provide written notice to the applicant of the approval or denial 16 of such application within one hundred eighty days of the receipt of the 17 application by the appropriate county or city. In the event such notice 18 is not provided within one hundred eighty days, the county or city shall 19 provide to the applicant, a refund of all fees and charges associated 20 with the submission of the application, unless the failure to provide 21 timely notice was due to a factor or factors beyond the control of the 22 city or county and the licensing officer. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law.